src/simple_insert.sbl
externals ( stem )

groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

stringdef a"   hex 'E4'
stringdef o"   hex 'F6'
stringdef u"   hex 'FC'

define v 'aeiouy{a"}{o"}{u"}'

define stem as (
    repeat goto (
        v [('u'] v <- 'U') or
           ('y'] v <- 'Y')
    )
)
